Mississippi, session 2026, SB2018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meaning herein ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Adjutant General" means the individual appointed and commissioned under Section 3337 as the Adjutant General of the department. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Military Department recognized under Section 3333. (c)  "Mississippi National Guard" has the meaning assigned under Section 3311(c). (d) "Program" means the "Mississippi National Guard Tricare Premium Reimbursement Program." (2)  There is hereby established the Mississippi National Guard Tricare Premium Reimbursement Program within the department to be administered by the Adjutant General subject to appropriation by the Legislature. (3)  The purpose of the program is to: (a)  Reimburse members of the Mississippi National Guard for the cost of premiums for Tricare Reserve Select health care plans; (b)  Enhance the medical readiness of the Mississippi National Guard; (c)  Assist members with their healthcare needs; and (d)  Retain qualified personnel in the Mississippi National Guard. (4)  A person shall be eligible for this program if he or she meets the following criteria: (a)  The person is eligible for Tricare Reserve Select Coverage; (b)  The person is not insured by another employer; and (c)  The person is an actively drilling member of the Mississippi National Guard. (5)  Eligible members who meet the reimbursement requirements as established by the department shall receive a reimbursement for eligible Tricare Reserve Select premiums paid at the current Tricare Reserve Select premium rate for "Tricare Reserve Select  Member only." (6)  The Adjutant General shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of the program. (7)  The funds for this program shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature. (8)  Beginning December 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the Adjutant General shall provide a report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of the program, including the number of participants, the impact on medical readiness and any recommendations for improvement. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.